Utah statutes.
31A-43-202.   Laws applicable to stop-loss insurance.

A stop-loss insurance contract or a re-insurance contract issued to a small employer that establishes a self-funded or partially self-funded health plan:

(1)  is not reinsurance under this title, and is not subject to the regulations for reinsurance under this title;

(2)  is subject to regulation as stop-loss insurance under this chapter; and

(3)  is subject to the contract provisions of this title in the same manner as insurance contracts issued by any other insurer.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

